Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-508.02
Witness committed to jail; receive witness fee.

A witness committed to jail under subdivision (4) of section 29-507 or 29-508 shall, in addition to the fee provided under section 33-139, receive an amount equal to the amount a witness receives under section 29-1908 for each day held in custody.

Laws 1981, LB 228, § 4.

Mileage, how computed, see section 81-1176.